Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-310
Compensation contracts contingent upon outcome of municipal election; contrary to public policy.

It is hereby declared to be detrimental to good government and the best interests of the state to permit payment to any person, firm or corporation of fees or compensation in any form, other than regular salaries of duly elected or appointed officers of a city or village, for services rendered to a city or village contingent or dependent upon the outcome of any municipal election.

Laws 1947, c. 49, § 1, p. 168.